test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-morin_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - морин: # 'horse' Neuter vowel, Cns final
    морин+N+Sg+Nom: морин
    морин+N+Sg+Acc: мориие
    морин+N+Sg+Gen: мориной
    морин+N+Sg+Dat: мориндо
    морин+N+Sg+Ins: морёор
    морин+N+Sg+Com: моринтой
    морин+N+Sg+Abl: моринһоо
    морин+N+Pl+Nom: морид
    морин+N+Pl+Acc: моридые
    морин+N+Pl+Gen: моридой
    морин+N+Pl+Dat: моридто
    морин+N+Pl+Ins: моридоор
    морин+N+Pl+Com: моридтой
    морин+N+Pl+Abl: моридһоо
